District of Columbia statutes.
3-2703

Repealed

Qualification of applicants; application.

Repealed.

Feb. 28, 1887, 24 Stat. 427, ch. 272, § 3
Mar. 4, 1925, 43 Stat. 1284, ch. 545
July 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-75, § 3(h), 23 DCR 1178
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1238, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 2-2403.
1973 Ed., § 2-1503.